Massachusetts, session 194th, H1680.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Subsection (d) of class A of section 31 of chapter 94C of the General Laws, as appearing
in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-
(9) Kratom, which for the purposes of this paragraph, shall mean any parts of the plant
Mitragyna speciosa, whether growing or not, and any compound, manufacture, salt, derivative,
mixture, product or preparation of the plant, including mitragynine and the metabolite 7-
hydroxymitragynine.
of 1